Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 3. Bonds

§ 2751.
Bonds; how conditioned.

Before acting as such, a guardian appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall give a bond with sureties in a sum as the court directs, conditioned as follows:

to make a true inventory of the real and personal estate of the ward coming to the guardian’s possession or knowledge and file the original with the court and serve copies of it as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure;

to manage and dispose of the estate and effects according to law and for the best interest of the ward and faithfully discharge the trust in relation thereto;

to render an account of the property of the ward in the guardian’s hands, including the proceeds of real estate sold by the guardian, and of the management and disposition of the same, within one year after appointment, if the ward has real or personal estate, or within one year after such estate comes to the guardian’s possession or knowledge, and at other times as the court directs;

at the expiration of the trust, to render and settle the account and pay over and deliver the estate and effects remaining in the guardian’s hands or due from settlement to the persons legally entitled to the same.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 129;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2752.
To respond for principal only; court may order income paid to parent.

When minor children inherit real or personal estate as the representatives of a deceased parent, or take the same by will, and the living parent of the children as guardian has the custody of their persons and estates, if the Probate Division of the Superior Court directs, the guardian shall furnish a bond to respond and pay the principal of the estate only.
The income of the estate shall be expended at the discretion of the guardian for the benefit of the children without account to the court.
When a person other than a parent of the children is their guardian and has the custody of their estates only, the court, from time to time, may order and direct the guardian to pay over to the parent of the children the part of the income of their estates, to be expended for their benefit as to the court seems just, in view of the relative value of the estate of the parent and the children.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 130;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2753.
Additional bond.

At any time the Probate Division of the Superior Court may require an additional bond of such guardian, to respond both principal and income, if the interest of the wards requires it.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2754.
New bond.

A ward, the heir apparent of a ward, or a person interested in the welfare of a ward, as defined in section 3061 of this title, may file a motion with the Probate Division of the Superior Court to require the guardian to give a new and sufficient bond.
If it appears to the court that the bond is insufficient, the court may order the guardian to give a new and sufficient bond.
When it appears on the motion of a surety in a guardian’s bond that the surety is liable to be injured thereby, the court may discharge the surety from future responsibility and order the guardian to give a new bond.
After being notified of the order, if the guardian does not give a new bond, the court may remove the guardian and appoint some other person.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 131;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2755.
Limitation of action on bond.

An action shall not be maintained against the sureties in a bond given by a guardian, unless it is commenced within four years from the time the guardian is discharged.
If the person entitled to commence the action is out of the State at the time of such discharge, he or she may commence such action within four years from the time he or she comes into the State.